Hawaii statutes.
[§452-23.5] Citation for licensee
violations; fines. (a) In addition to any other remedy available under
this chapter, the department of commerce and consumer affairs may issue a
citation to any person who holds a massage therapist or massage therapy establishment
license issued by the board, or is designated the principal massage therapist
by the massage therapy establishment, for any of the following violations of
this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter and chapter 91:

(1) Failure of a massage therapy establishment,
during all hours of operation, to conspicuously display a current massage
therapy establishment license and the current licenses and permits of all
persons employed by the massage therapy establishment who engage in the practice
of massage therapy;

(2) Failure of a principal massage therapist to
ensure that every massage therapist apprentice who engages in the practice of
massage therapy at the massage therapy establishment wears a conspicuously
placed name tag stating the massage therapist apprentice's name and the word
"apprentice" during all hours of operation;

(3) Operation of a massage therapy establishment
without the presence of a principal massage therapist or a licensed designee
during all hours of operation; or

(4) Failure of a massage therapist or massage therapy
establishment to include the respective massage therapist's or massage therapy
establishment's current license number in any advertisement pursuant to section
452-23(b).

(b) Each citation:

(1) Shall be in writing and describe the basis of the
citation, including the specific statute or rule violated;

(2) May contain an order of abatement and the
assessment of a fine in the amount of $250 for each violation;

(3) Shall be served on the licensee by personal
service; and

(4) Shall inform the licensee that the licensee may
submit a written request to the board for a hearing to contest the citation,
within twenty calendar days from the service of the citation.

(c) If the licensee timely submits a written
request to the board for a hearing, the board may designate a hearings officer
to conduct the hearing in accordance with chapter 91.

(d) If the licensee does not timely submit a
written request to the board for a hearing, the citation shall be deemed a
final order of the board.

(e) Failure of a licensee to pay any assessed
fine within thirty calendar days, unless the licensee contests the citation,
may result in further disciplinary action by the board. [L 2016, c 146, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next